Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2327.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 11-483, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-483. Records maintained by county recorder; confidentiality; applicability; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in any county an eligible person may request that the general public be prohibited from accessing the unique identifier and the recording date that person's identifying information that is contained in indexes of recorded instruments THAT are maintained by the county recorder, including any data that may be used directly or indirectly to identify that person, and may request the county recorder to prohibit access to that person's identifying information, including that is contained in any of the following: 1. That person's documents, instruments or writings recorded by the county recorder. 2. If the person is a public official, the address of a property held in trust by the public official. B. An eligible person may request this action by filing an affidavit that states all of the following on an application form developed by the administrative office of the courts in agreement with an association of counties, an organization of peace officers and the motor vehicle division of the department of transportation: 1. The person's full legal name and residential address. 2. The full legal description and parcel number of the person's property. 3. Unless the person is the spouse of a peace officer or the spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer or the person is a former public official or former judge, the position the person currently holds and a description of the person's duties, except that an eligible person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment shall instead attach a copy of the order of protection or injunction against harassment or an eligible person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program shall instead attach a copy of the participant's current and valid address confidentiality program authorization card issued pursuant to section 41-163 and a statement of certification provided by the secretary of state's office. 4. The reasons the person reasonably believes that the person's life or safety or that of another person is in danger and that restricting access pursuant to this section will serve to reduce the danger. 5. The document locator number and recording date of each instrument for which the person requests access restriction pursuant to this section. 6. A copy of pages from each instrument that includes the document locator number and the person's identifying information, including the person's full legal name and residential address or full legal name and telephone number. C. If an eligible person is also requesting pursuant to section 11-484 that the general public be prohibited from accessing records maintained by the county assessor and county treasurer, the eligible person may combine the request pursuant to subsection B of this section with the request pursuant to section 11-484 by filing one affidavit. The affidavit and subsequent action by the appropriate authorities shall meet all of the requirements of this section and section 11-484. D. The affidavit shall be filed with the presiding judge of the superior court in the county in which the affiant resides. To prevent multiple filings, an eligible person who is a peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member or law enforcement support staff member shall deliver the affidavit to the peace officer's commanding officer, or to the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, who shall file the affidavits at one time. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier presentation, the commanding officer, or the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, shall not file affidavits more often than quarterly. E. On receipt of an affidavit or affidavits, the presiding judge of the superior court shall file with the clerk of the superior court a petition on behalf of all requesting affiants. Each affidavit presented shall be attached to the petition. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier consideration, the presiding judge may accumulate affidavits and file a petition at the end of each quarter. F. The presiding judge of the superior court shall review the petition and each attached affidavit to determine whether the action requested by each affiant should be granted. If the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that the action requested by the affiant will reduce a danger to the life or safety of the affiant or another person, the presiding judge of the superior court shall order that the county recorder prohibit access for five years to the affiant's identifying information, including any of that person's documents, instruments or writings recorded by the county recorder and made available on the internet. If the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that the affiant or another person is in actual danger of physical harm from a person or persons with whom the affiant has had official dealings and that action pursuant to this section will reduce a danger to the life or safety of the affiant or another person, the presiding judge of the superior court shall order that the general public be prohibited for five years from accessing the unique identifier and the recording date the person's identifying information contained in indexes of recorded instruments maintained by the county recorder and identified pursuant to subsection B of this section. G. On motion to the court, if the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that an instrument or writing recorded by the county recorder has been redacted or sealed in error, that the original affiant no longer lives at the address listed in the original affidavit, that the cause for the original affidavit no longer exists or that temporary access to the instrument or writing is needed, the presiding judge may temporarily stay or permanently vacate all or part of the court order prohibiting public access to the recorded instrument or writing. H. On entry of the court order, the clerk of the superior court shall file the court order and a copy of the affidavit required by subsection B of this section with the county recorder. Not more than ten days after the date on which the county recorder receives the court order, the county recorder shall restrict access to the information as required by subsection F of this section. I. If the court denies an affiant's request pursuant to this section, the affiant may request a court hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the court in the county where the petition was filed. J. The county recorder shall remove the restrictions on all records restricted pursuant to this section by January 5 in the year after the court order expires. The county recorder shall send by mail one notice to either the health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment or the employing agency of the peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member or employee of adult protective services who was granted an order pursuant to this section of the order's expiration date at least six months before the expiration date. If the notice is sent to the employing agency, the employing agency shall immediately notify the person who was granted the order of the upcoming expiration date. The county recorder may coordinate with the county assessor and county treasurer to prevent multiple notices from being sent to the same person. K. To include subsequent recordings in the court order, the eligible person shall present to the county recorder at the time of recordation a certified copy of the court order or shall provide to the county recorder the recording number of the court order. The county recorder shall ensure that public access is restricted pursuant to subsection A of this section. L. This section does not restrict access to public records for the purposes of perfecting a lien pursuant to title 12, chapter 9, article 2. M. This section does not prohibit access to the unredacted records of the county recorder by parties to the instrument, a law enforcement officer performing the officer's official duties pursuant to subsection N of this section, a title insurer, a title insurance agent or an escrow agent licensed by the department of insurance and financial institutions. N. A law enforcement officer is deemed to be performing the officer's official duties if the officer provides a subpoena, court order or search warrant for the records. O. This section does not apply to an eligible person's voter registration record. O. P. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Code enforcement officer" means a person who is employed by a state or local government and whose duties include performing field inspections of buildings, structures or property to ensure compliance with and enforce national, state and local laws, ordinances and codes. 2. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 3. "Corrections support staff member" means an adult or juvenile corrections employee who has direct contact with inmates. 4. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407. 5. "Eligible person" means a health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, justice, judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, adult or juvenile corrections officer, corrections support staff member, probation officer, member of the commission on appellate court appointments, member of the board of executive clemency, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment, national guard member who is acting in support of a law enforcement agency, person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment, person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program pursuant to title 41, chapter 1, article 3 or firefighter who is assigned to the Arizona counter terrorism information center in the department of public safety. 6. "Former public official" means a person who was duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature or a statewide office, who ceased serving in that capacity and who was the victim of a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105 while in office. 7. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 8. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 9. "Indexes" means only those indexes that are maintained by and located in the office of the county recorder, that are accessed electronically and that contain information beginning from and after January 1, 1987. 9. "Identifying information": (a) Means any recorded data or information that alone or in connection with other records has the capability of uniquely identifying, tracing or authenticating any of the following: (i) a specific individual. (ii) A specific individual's ownership interest in an entity. (iii) A trust in which a specific individual is a trustee, trustor or beneficiary. (b) Includes: (i) A full name, maiden name or alias. (ii) Government-issued identifiers. (iii) Biometric identifiers. (iv) Unique digital or device identifiers. (v) Sensitive personal data. (vi) Any other information that reasonably enables identification through analysis, correction or linkability. (c) does not include: (i) A parcel number. (ii) The legal description of a property. (iii) A property address. (iv) any other property identifier. 10. "Judge" means a judge or former judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the United States immigration court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 11. "Justice" means a justice of the United States or Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 12. "Law enforcement support staff member" means a person who serves in the role of an investigator or prosecutorial assistant in an agency that investigates or prosecutes crimes, who is integral to the investigation or prosecution of crimes and whose name or identity will be revealed in the course of public proceedings. 13. "Peace officer": (a) Means any person vested by law, or formerly vested by law, with a duty to maintain public order and make arrests. (b) Includes a federal law enforcement officer or agent who resides in this state and who has the power to make arrests pursuant to federal law. 14. "Prosecutor" means a current or former county attorney, municipal prosecutor, attorney general or United States attorney and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 15. "Public defender" means a federal public defender, county public defender, county legal defender or county contract indigent defense counsel and includes an assistant or deputy federal public defender, county public defender or county legal defender. 16. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 11-484, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-484. Records maintained by county assessor and county treasurer; redaction; applicability; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in any county an eligible person may request that the general public be prohibited from accessing that person's identifying information, including any data that may be used to directly or indirectly identify that person, that is included in any of the following: 1. That person's documents, instruments, writings and information maintained by the county assessor and the county treasurer. 2. If the person is a public official, the address of a property held in trust by the public official. B. An eligible person may request this action by filing an affidavit that states all of the following on an application form developed by the administrative office of the courts in agreement with an association of counties, an organization of peace officers and the motor vehicle division of the department of transportation: 1. The person's full legal name and residential address. 2. The full legal description and parcel number of the person's property. 3. Unless the person is the spouse of a peace officer or the spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer or the person is a former public official or former judge, the position the person currently holds and a description of the person's duties, except that an eligible person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment shall attach a copy of the order of protection or injunction against harassment or an eligible person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program shall instead attach a copy of the participant's current and valid address confidentiality program authorization card issued pursuant to section 41-163 and a statement of certification provided by the secretary of state's office. 4. The reasons the person reasonably believes that the person's life or safety or that of another person is in danger and that redacting the person's identifying information, including the residential address and telephone number, will serve to reduce the danger. C. If an eligible person is also requesting pursuant to section 11-483 that the general public be prohibited from accessing records maintained by the county recorder, the eligible person may combine the request pursuant to subsection B of this section with the request pursuant to section 11-483 by filing one affidavit. The affidavit and subsequent action by the appropriate authorities shall meet all of the requirements of this section and section 11-483. D. The affidavit shall be filed with the presiding judge of the superior court in the county in which the affiant resides. To prevent multiple filings, an eligible person who is a peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member or law enforcement support staff member shall deliver the affidavit to the peace officer's commanding officer, or to the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, who shall file the affidavits at one time. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier presentation, the commanding officer, or the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, shall not file affidavits more often than quarterly. E. On receipt of an affidavit or affidavits, the presiding judge of the superior court shall file with the clerk of the superior court a petition on behalf of all requesting affiants. Each affidavit presented shall be attached to the petition. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier consideration, the presiding judge may accumulate affidavits and file a petition at the end of each quarter. F. The presiding judge of the superior court shall review the petition and each attached affidavit to determine whether the action requested by each affiant should be granted. If the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that the action requested by the affiant will reduce a danger to the life or safety of the affiant or another person, the presiding judge of the superior court shall order the redaction of the affiant's identifying information, including any of that person's documents, instruments, writings and information maintained by the county assessor and the county treasurer. The redaction shall be in effect for five years. G. On motion to the court, if the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that an instrument or writing maintained by the county assessor or the county treasurer has been redacted or sealed in error, that the original affiant no longer lives at the address listed in the original affidavit, that the cause for the original affidavit no longer exists or that temporary access to the instrument or writing is needed, the presiding judge may temporarily stay or permanently vacate all or part of the court order prohibiting public access to the instrument or writing. H. On entry of the court order, the clerk of the superior court shall file the court order and a copy of the affidavit required by subsection B of this section with the county assessor and the county treasurer.  Not more than ten days after the date on which the county assessor and the county treasurer receive the court order, the county assessor and the county treasurer shall restrict access to the information as required by subsection F of this section. I. If the court denies an affiant's request pursuant to this section, the affiant may request a court hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the court in the county where the petition was filed. J. The county assessor and the county treasurer shall remove the restrictions on all records that are redacted pursuant to this section by January 5 in the year after the court order expires. The county assessor or the county treasurer shall send by mail one notice to either the health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment or the employing agency of the peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member or employee of adult protective services who was granted an order pursuant to this section of the order's expiration date at least six months before the expiration date.  If the notice is sent to the employing agency, the employing agency shall immediately notify the person who was granted the order of the upcoming expiration date. The county assessor or county treasurer may coordinate with the county recorder to prevent multiple notices from being sent to the same person. K. This section does not apply to an eligible person's voter registration record. K. L. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Code enforcement officer" means a person who is employed by a state or local government and whose duties include performing field inspections of buildings, structures or property to ensure compliance with and enforce national, state and local laws, ordinances and codes. 2. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 3. "Corrections support staff member" means an adult or juvenile corrections employee who has direct contact with inmates. 4. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407. 5. "Eligible person" means a health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, justice, judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, adult or juvenile corrections officer, corrections support staff member, probation officer, member of the commission on appellate court appointments, member of the board of executive clemency, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment, national guard member who is acting in support of a law enforcement agency, person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment, person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program pursuant to title 41, chapter 1, article 3, or firefighter who is assigned to the Arizona counter terrorism information center in the department of public safety. 6. "Former public official" means a person who was duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature or a statewide office, who ceased serving in that capacity and who was the victim of a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105 while in office. 7. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 8. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 9. "Identifying information": (a) Means any recorded data or information that alone or in connection with other records has the capability of uniquely identifying, tracing or authenticating any of the following: (i) a specific individual. (ii) A specific individual's ownership interest in an entity. (iii) A trust in which a specific individual is a trustee, trustor or beneficiary. (b) Includes: (i) A full name, maiden name or alias. (ii) Government-issued identifiers. (iii) Biometric identifiers. (iv) Unique digital or device identifiers. (v) Sensitive personal data. (vi) Any other information that reasonably enables identification through analysis, correction or linkability. (c) Does not include: (i) A parcel number. (ii) The legal description of a property. (iii) A property address. (iv) any other property identifier. 9. 10. "Judge" means a judge or former judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the United States immigration court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 10. 11. "Justice" means a justice of the United States or Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 11. 12. "Law enforcement support staff member" means a person who serves in the role of an investigator or prosecutorial assistant in an agency that investigates or prosecutes crimes, who is integral to the investigation or prosecution of crimes and whose name or identity will be revealed in the course of public proceedings. 12. 13. "Peace officer": (a) Means any person vested by law, or formerly vested by law, with a duty to maintain public order and make arrests. (b) Includes a federal law enforcement officer or agent who resides in this state and who has the power to make arrests pursuant to federal law. 13. 14. "Prosecutor" means a current or former county attorney, municipal prosecutor, attorney general or United States attorney and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 14. 15. "Public defender" means a federal public defender, county public defender, county legal defender or county contract indigent defense counsel and includes an assistant or deputy federal public defender, county public defender or county legal defender. 15. 16. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.